Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 62 Military Personnel
12-62-411. Recordation of certificate of discharge.

Any resident of the State of Arkansas who was in or called to military or naval service in the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Merchant Marine Corps, Women's Army Auxiliary Corps, Women's Auxiliary Volunteer for Emergency Service, Nurses, and all other branches of the armed forces of the United States during World War II, and has been discharged from such service, may present his or her certificate of discharge to the recorder of the county of his or her residence or from which he or she was called to service, and have the same recorded.

It shall be the duty of the recorder in such county to record without charges and to index the discharge in a record book to be kept by him or her for that purpose.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 147, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1705, 11-1706.

12-62-412. Molestation of guard while on duty — Penalty.

Any person who interrupts, molests, or insults by abusive words or behavior, or obstructs any officer or soldier of the organized militia while on duty, either at parade, drill meeting for military improvement, or other military duty may be immediately put and kept under guard by the officer in command until the duty is concluded.

The officer may turn over such person to any peace officer of the city or place where the drill, parade, or meeting is being held, and the peace officer shall thereupon deliver the offender for examination and trial before any court having jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 192; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1003.

12-62-413. Employment protection for members of armed forces.

A person who is called to active state duty as a member of the armed forces of this state or any other state, including without limitation the National Guard, a reserve component of the armed forces, or the militia, is afforded such employment and reemployment rights, privileges, benefits, and protections in employment as though that person had been called to active duty in the service of the United States and shall not be denied hiring, retention in employment, promotion, or other incidents or advantages of employment because of any obligation as a member of the armed forces.

In any civil action to enforce the provisions of this section, the prevailing party may be allowed a reasonable attorney's fee to be assessed by the court and collected as costs.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 925, § 1; 1993, No. 1036, § 1; 2011, No. 1164, § 2.

12-62-414. Extensions for renewing certain documents — Paying certain fees.

A member of the National Guard or reserve component of the United States Armed Forces who is a resident of this state and who is ordered to active duty or state active duty to a duty station located outside of this state shall be allowed an extension for:

The period that the service member is serving on active duty or state active duty at a duty station located outside of this state; and

A period of at least ninety (90) days and not more than one (1) year after the service member is released from active duty or state active duty.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 996, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 936; 2019, No. 462, §§ 11, 12.

Subchapter 5

— Arkansas National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program of 1995

12-62-501. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly recognizes that:

Modern warfare and the corresponding advancements in weapons require a higher level of intelligence and skill and, therefore, a better educated soldier. Minimum enlistment criteria are increasing with the passage of time and the advent of new technology;

While enlistment incentives have remained the same for Reserve forces, they have steadily declined or have been eliminated for the National Guard;

The General Assembly further recognizes that:

In the absence of additional incentives, Arkansas's potential enlistees and current members will be attracted to active duty or to Reserve or National Guard units in surrounding states;

While tuition incentives may replace other incentives that have been eliminated and may encourage college-qualified persons to enlist and continue their education, a loan repayment program encourages personal responsibility and long-term commitment to pursuit of educational goals;

Utilizing a combined program of education loans and tuition incentives for new recruits and education loans for eligible existing members encourages a better-educated population while rewarding bright and responsible young persons for long-term community service in the National Guard; and

An incentive that is targeted as an educational loan repayment has the dual benefit of encouraging and assisting the pursuit of postsecondary education while making enlistment in the Arkansas National Guard more attractive. The program also brings Arkansas's incentives for enlistment more in parity with surrounding states.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 187, § 1; 1995, No. 265, § 1.

12-62-502. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Approved institution” means an Arkansas public or private postsecondary institution that is accredited or has achieved candidacy status from the Higher Learning Commission or is a technical institute or comprehensive lifelong learning center under the supervision of the Division of Higher Education;

“Eligible member” means both nonprior service and prior service persons who are otherwise qualified, whether or not currently serving, who are enlisting or extending their enlistment in the Arkansas National Guard for a period of at least six (6) years;

“High personnel readiness units” means those units with special manpower needs as designated by the Adjutant General pursuant to rule, based upon:

The mobilization priority of the unit;

The difficulty of attracting, qualifying, and enlisting new members;

The ability to maintain acceptable strength levels within the unit; and

Such other factors as the Adjutant General may deem appropriate; and

“Qualified applicant” means an eligible member who:

Has met all requirements for enlistment or reenlistment and has enlisted in a position vacancy in a unit designated as a high personnel readiness unit;

Has a sufficient score to be rated as category IIIA or higher based upon scores on standard military tests (score of 50 or higher on the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery or equivalent);

Meets and continues to meet Good Soldier or Good Airman criteria as set by the Adjutant General;

Is a secondary school graduate or is expected to graduate from secondary school within two (2) years;

Is not currently pursuing a postgraduate degree;

Is not a permanent civilian technician or member of the active National Guard or Reserve, or extending or enlisting for the purpose of becoming either; and

Meets the current scholastic criteria of and is currently approved to receive a student loan under any state or federal program approved by the Division of Higher Education, and is, or will be upon approval of such loan, enrolled as a full-time student in good standing at an approved institution.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in the introductory language of (3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Workforce Education” in (1); and substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (4)(G).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 187, § 2; 1995, No. 265, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 937; 2019, No. 910, §§
2228, 2229.

12-62-503. Arkansas National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program.

There is established the Arkansas National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program, which shall provide for the repayment of loans secured by qualified applicants who are eligible members of the Arkansas National Guard in amounts of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) in principal per annum or five hundred dollars ($500) per semester, plus all related accrued interest, up to a maximum total loan principal of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

No payment may be made for any loan that is in default at the time of application or award.

Student loan repayment awards must be used at an approved institution.

Student loan repayment awards are available only for payment toward undergraduate studies, when used at a college or university.

Eligible members must enlist for at least six (6) years in a unit identified as a high readiness unit by the Adjutant General and have completed training and been awarded a military occupation specialty or Air Force skill code before payment may be made.

In order to be eligible for a second or any subsequent semester award, a student must continue in good standing at an approved institution and must continue as a satisfactory participant in a high personnel readiness unit in the Arkansas National Guard, meeting Good Soldier or Good Airman requirements, as certified by his or her unit commander.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c)(2).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading, and in (a)(2), (b), and (c); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (c).

A.C.R.C. Notes. For current law, see §6-60-214.

Acts 2017, No. 471, § 4, provided: “An eligible service member who is enrolled in an approved institution that is a private postsecondary institution and receiving a tuition incentive under the Arkansas National Guard Tuition Incentive Program as of the effective date of this act [March 13, 2017] shall continue to receive the tuition incentive under §12-62-601 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2017.”

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas National Guard Tuition Incentive Program, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 471, § 3. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-62-601. Acts 1995, No. 186, § 1; 1995, No. 346, § 1.

12-62-602. Acts 1995, No. 186, § 2; 1995, No. 346, § 2; 2009, No. 214, § 1; 2013, No. 1012, § 1; 2015, No. 865, § 13.

12-62-603. Acts 1995, No. 186, § 3; 1995, No. 346, § 3; 2009, No. 214, § 2.

12-62-604. Acts 1995, No. 186, § 4; 1995, No. 346, § 4.

12-62-605. Acts 1995, No. 186, § 5; 1995, No. 346, § 5; 2009, No. 214, § 3.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 187, § 3; 1995, No. 265, § 3.

12-62-504. Application process.

(1)Qualified applicants for the Arkansas National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program may apply by obtaining an application form from, and signed by, his or her unit commander.

The application shall include as an attachment a certification by an appropriate officer of the approved institution verifying that the applicant has been accepted or remains in good standing as a full-time student for the school year in which the loan repayment is sought, and must include certification from a qualified lending institution that a loan has been approved and is not in default.

(1)(A)Qualified applicants must obtain an additional certification from the approved institution verifying his or her continued enrollment as a full-time student in good standing in order to receive the second or any subsequent semester award.

Such certification shall be presented to the unit commander within thirty (30) days of the beginning of the semester for which a loan repayment is sought.

Verification from a qualified lending institution that an approved loan is in place and not in default must accompany each subsequent certification.

(1)It shall be the responsibility of the unit to forward completed applications, including recertifications from an approved institution and verifications from the lender, to the Arkansas National Guard Incentive Officer for processing and payment.

Payment shall be made directly to the approved institution, on behalf of and for the benefit of the qualified applicant, in a manner as may be established by rule of the Adjutant General.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 187, § 4; 1995, No. 265, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 938.

12-62-505. Rules.

(1)The Adjutant General shall establish, implement, and enforce such administrative rules as are necessary for implementation of the Arkansas National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program.

The rules shall include criteria for selection from among applicants in those circumstances in which the number of applicants exceeds appropriated funding for the calendar year.

In establishing rules relating to academic qualification, certification, recertification, and payment, the Adjutant General shall obtain the advice of the Division of Higher Education.

To the extent possible, the division shall include the program among other existing financial aid programs and shall monitor the program and enforce policies, as necessary, to conform with division rules.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 187, § 5; 1995, No. 265, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 939; 2019, No. 910, §
2230.

Subchapter 6

— Arkansas National Guard Tuition Incentive Program

12-62-601 — 12-62-605. [Repealed.]

12-62-701. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to as the Arkansas Soldiers' and Airmen's Civil Relief Act.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 1.

12-62-702. Findings.

Soldiers and airmen of the Arkansas National Guard who are called into active military service for the State of Arkansas are ineligible for civil relief under federal law, namely, the Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940, 50 U.S.C. App. § 501 et seq.

Relief should be provided to the soldiers and airmen when they are called into extended active military service for the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 2.

12-62-703. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to provide civil relief to soldiers and airmen of the Arkansas National Guard who are called into the extended active military service of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 3.

12-62-704. Applicability.

This subchapter and the benefits of this subchapter apply to and may be claimed by a soldier, airman, or the spouse of a soldier or airman of the Arkansas National Guard who meets one (1) of the following requirements:

The soldier or airman is ordered into the active military service of the State of Arkansas by the Governor under state law for a period of more than one hundred eighty (180) continuous days;

The soldier or airman is ordered into the active military service of the State of Arkansas by the Governor under the provisions of Title 32, United States Code, for a period of more than one hundred eighty (180) continuous days; or

The soldier or airman is ordered into active duty by the Governor under state law or under Title 32 of the United States Code for any period of time as a direct result of the execution of an Emergency Management Assistance Compact or proclamation by the Governor.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (3).

Cited: Cato v. Craighead County Circuit Court, 2009 Ark. 334, 322 S.W.3d 484 (2009).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 4; 2019, No. 462, § 13.

12-62-705. Residential leases.

When a soldier or airman is ordered to active military service of the State of Arkansas for more than one hundred eighty (180) days under §12-62-704, the soldier or airman, or the spouse of the soldier or airman, is entitled to terminate and cancel the lease for the primary residence of the soldier, airman, or spouse of the soldier or airman as follows:

The airman or soldier, the spouse of the soldier or airman, or his or her attorney-in-fact or lawfully appointed agent shall deliver a written notice to the lessor or the lessor's agent by any manner of mail, courier, or personal delivery accompanied by a written receipt as evidence of delivery;

The notice shall state:

The beginning date, and the ending date if known, that the soldier or airman has been ordered into the military service of the state;

The unit name, address, and telephone number of the soldier's or airman's commanding officer or military superior who may verify the authenticity of the orders and where the soldier, airman, or spouse may be written; and

That the soldier or airman, or spouse of the soldier or airman, claims the benefits of this subchapter and gives notice that his or her residential lease will be terminated as provided by this subchapter; and

The notice shall be accompanied by:

Payment of the current month's rent and any monthly charges regularly assessed as a monthly consideration of the lease; and

Payment of the next month's rent and any monthly charges regularly assessed as a monthly consideration of the lease that shall accrue through the last day of the next month following the month during which the notice was mailed or delivered.

Any prepaid monthly consideration, security deposit, or other sums held by the lessor may be deducted from the payment amounts.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 5.

12-62-706. Reopening default judgments.

A default judgment rendered in any civil action against a service member during a period of military service or within thirty (30) days after termination of the military service may be set aside if:

The person was prejudiced by reason of his or her military service in making a defense to the action;

Application by the person or his or her legal representative is made to the court rendering the judgment not later than sixty (60) days after the termination of the military service; and

The application provides enough facts that it appears that the person has a meritorious or legal defense to the action or some part of the action.

Vacating, setting aside, or reversing any judgment because of any of the provisions of this subchapter may not impair any right or title acquired by any bona fide purchaser for value under the judgment.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 6.

12-62-707. Stay of proceedings.

If at any point during an action or proceeding it appears that a plaintiff or defendant is a service member and in the conduct of the proceedings may be adversely affected by his or her military service, the court may, on its own motion, stay the proceedings.

The court may stay the proceedings if the service member or another person on his or her behalf makes a request in writing to the court, unless the court determines on the record that the ability of the plaintiff to pursue the action or the defendant to conduct his or her defense is not materially affected by reason of his or her military service.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 7.

12-62-708. Fines and penalties on contracts.

If compliance with the terms of a contract is stayed under this subchapter, a fine or penalty may not accrue by reason of failure to comply during the period of the stay.

If a service member has not obtained a stay and a fine or penalty is imposed for nonperformance of an obligation, a court may relieve enforcement if the service member was in military service when the penalty was incurred and his or her ability to pay or perform was materially impaired.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 8.

12-62-709. Exercise of rights not to affect future financial transactions.

Application by a service member in military service for, or receipt of, a stay, postponement, or suspension under this subchapter in the payment of any fine, penalty, insurance premium, or other civil obligation or liability may not be used for any of the following:

A determination by any lender or other person that the service member is unable to pay any civil obligation or liability in accordance with its terms;

With respect to a credit transaction between a creditor and a service member:

A denial or revocation of credit by the creditor;

A change by the creditor in the terms of an existing credit arrangement; or

A refusal by the creditor to grant credit to the service member in substantially the amount or on substantially the terms requested; or

An adverse report relating to the creditworthiness of the service member by or to any person or entity engaged in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 9.

12-62-710. Stay of execution of judgment.

Unless the court determines on the record that the ability of the service member to comply with the judgment or order entered or sought is not materially affected by reason of his or her military service, the court may, on its own motion, or upon application to it by the service member or another person on his or her behalf:

Stay the execution of any judgment or order entered against the service member, as provided in this subchapter; and

Vacate or stay any attachment or garnishment of property, money, or debts in the hands of another, whether before or after judgment as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 10.

12-62-711. Duration of stay.

Any stay of an action, proceeding, attachment, or execution ordered by any court under this subchapter may be ordered for the period of military service, plus sixty (60) days after its termination or any part of that time period.

Where the service member in military service is a codefendant with others, the plaintiff, with leave of the court, may proceed against the others.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 11.

12-62-712. Statutes of limitations affected by military service.

The period of military service is not included in computing any period limited by law, rule, or order for bringing an action or proceeding in any court, board, bureau, commission, department, or other agency of government by or against any person in military service or by or against his or her heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns, whether the cause of action or the right or privilege to institute the action or proceeding has accrued before or during the period of military service.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 12.

12-62-713. Maximum rate of interest for state active military service.

An obligation or liability bearing interest at a rate in excess of six percent (6%) per year incurred by a service member in military service before his or her entry into state active military service may not bear interest at a rate in excess of six percent (6%) per year during any part of the period of military service unless, in the opinion of the court and upon application to the court by the obligee, the ability of the service member to pay interest on the obligation or liability at a rate in excess of six percent (6%) per year is not materially affected by reason of his or her service.

The court may make any order in the action that, in its opinion, is just.

When a stay is granted or other order is made by the court, the owner of the premises shall be entitled, upon application, to relief with respect to the premises to the extent and for any period as the court determines to be just and reasonable under the circumstances.

Any person who knowingly takes part, or attempts to do so, in any eviction or distress otherwise than as provided in subsection (a) of this section is guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor.

The Governor may order an allotment of the pay of a service member in military service in reasonable proportion to discharge the rent of premises occupied for dwelling purposes by any dependents of the service member.

Order repayment of any prior installments or deposits as a condition of terminating the contract and resuming possession of the property;

Order a stay of the proceedings on its own motion or on a motion by the service member or another person on his or her behalf; or

Make any other disposition of the case it considers to be equitable to conserve the interests of all parties.

Cross References. Misdemeanors, §5-1-107.

The property is still owned by the service member or his or her dependent at the time relief is sought.

Cross References. Misdemeanors, §5-1-107.

Stay the proceedings as provided in this subchapter; or

Make any other disposition the court considers to be equitable to conserve the interest of all the parties.

Any person who knowingly takes any action contrary to the provisions of this section, or attempts to do so, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Cross References. Misdemeanors, §5-1-107.

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 920, § 2: Mar. 18, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that since September 11, 2001, the country has an increased need for soldiers to protect against terrorist acts and threats to our national security posed by other countries; that members of the National Guard and Reserves risk their lives to protect and defend our country at home and abroad; that military service is honorable and citizens who choose to serve their country deserve respect and to be treated fairly; that members of the National Guard and Reserves are being denied employment and being discriminated against in other ways because of their status as soldiers; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the citizens who choose to honor their country by serving in the military from being denied employment or being discriminated against in other ways because of their military service. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 13.

12-62-714. Eviction or distress of dependents of state active military service members.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, a landlord may not evict or take and hold property of a service member or his or her dependents for nonpayment of rent during the service member's period of military service if the rent on the premises occupied by the service member or his or her dependents is less than one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per month.

If the landlord petitions the court for an order affecting the service member or his or her dependent's right of possession, then a court may allow the landlord to evict and hold the property of a service member or his or her dependents under this subdivision (a)(2).

In any action affecting the right of possession, the court on its own motion may stay the proceedings for not longer than three (3) months or make any order the court determines to be reasonable and just under the circumstances unless the court finds that the ability of the tenant to pay the agreed rent is not materially affected by reason of the service member's military service.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 14.

12-62-715. Installment contracts.

The creditor of a service member who, before entry into military service, has entered into an installment contract for the purchase of real or personal property shall not terminate the contract or repossess the property for nonpayment or any breach occurring during military service without an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.

The court, upon application to it under this section, unless the court finds on the record that the ability of the service member to comply with the terms of the contract is not materially affected by reason of his or her military service, may:

Any person who knowingly repossesses property that is the subject of this section other than as provided in subsection (a) of this section is guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 15.

12-62-716. Mortgage foreclosures.

The creditor of a service member who, before entry into military service, has entered into a mortgage contract with the service member or his or her dependent for the purchase of real or personal property may not foreclose on the mortgage or repossess the property for nonpayment or any breach occurring during military service without an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.

The court, upon application under this section, unless the court finds on the record that the ability of the service member to comply with the terms of the mortgage is not materially affected by reason of his or her military service, may:

Order repayment of any prior installments or deposits as a condition of terminating the contract and resuming possession of the property;

Order a stay of the proceedings on its own motion or on motion by the service member or another person on his or her behalf; or

Make any other disposition of the case as it considers to be equitable to conserve the interests of all parties.

In order to come within the provisions of this section, the service member or dependent shall establish the following:

The relief is sought on an obligation secured by a mortgage, trust deed, or other security in the nature of a mortgage on either real or personal property;

The obligation originated before the service member's entry into military service;

The property was owned by the service member or his or her dependent before the commencement of military service; and

Any person who knowingly forecloses on property which is the subject of this section other than as provided in subsection (a) of this section is guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 16.

12-62-717. Application for relief.

A person, at any time during his or her period of military service or within sixty (60) days after discharge or termination, may apply to a court for relief in respect of any obligation or liability incurred by the person before his or her period of military service.

The court, after appropriate notice and hearing, unless in its opinion the ability of the applicant to comply with the terms of the obligation or liability has not been materially affected by reason of his or her military service, may grant the following relief:

In the case of an obligation payable under its terms in installments under a contract for the purchase of real estate or secured by a mortgage or other instrument in the nature of a mortgage upon real estate, a stay of the enforcement of the obligation during the applicant's period of military service, and from the date of termination of the period of military service or from the date of application if made after termination of military service, for a period equal to the period of the remaining life of the installment contract or other instrument plus a period of time equal to the period of military service of the applicant, or any part of the combined period, subject to payment of the balance of principal and accumulated interest due and unpaid at the date of termination of the period of military service or from the date of application, in equal installments during the combined period at the rate of interest on the unpaid balance as is prescribed in the contract, or other instrument evidencing the obligation, for installments paid when due, and subject to any other terms as the court may consider just; or

In the case of any other obligation or liability, a stay of the enforcement during the applicant's period of military service, and from the date of termination of the period of military service or from the date of application, if made after termination of the period of military service, for a period of time equal to the period of military service of the applicant or any part of that period, subject to payment of the balance of principal and accumulated interest due and unpaid at the date of termination of the period of military service or the date of application, in equal periodic installments during the extended period at the rate of interest prescribed for the obligation or liability if paid when due, and subject to other terms the court considers to be reasonable and just.

When any court has granted a stay as provided in this section, a fine or penalty may not be accrued for failure to comply with the terms or conditions of the obligation or liability for which the stay was granted during the period with which the terms and conditions of the stay are complied.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 17.

12-62-718. Storage liens.

(1)A person may not exercise any right to foreclose or enforce any lien for storage of household goods, furniture, or personal effects of a service member in military service during the service member's period of military service and for sixty (60) days after termination or discharge, except upon an order previously granted by a court upon application and a return to the court made and approved by the court.

In the proceeding after hearing the matter, unless in the opinion of the court the ability of a service member to pay storage charges due is not materially affected by reason of his or her military service, the court on its own motion may, and shall on application to it by a service member in military service or another person on his or her behalf:

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1003, § 18.

Subchapter 8

— Military Service Protection Act

12-62-801. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Military Service Protection Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.

12-62-802. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Back pay” means the amount of compensation that an employee would have earned if the employer had not engaged in conduct prohibited under this subchapter.

“Back pay” shall not include any compensation that would have been earned before two (2) years from the date that the cause of action permitted under this subchapter is initially filed;

“Compensatory damages” means damages for:

Back pay and interest on back pay;

Mental anguish;

Loss of dignity; or

Other intangible injuries;

“Employee” means a person who performs work or service of any type for compensation on a full-time or part-time basis.

“Employee” includes an applicant for a position to perform work or service for compensation.

“Employee” does not include:

Any individual employed by his or her parents, spouse, or child;

An individual participating in a specialized employment training program conducted by a nonprofit sheltered workshop or rehabilitation facility;

An individual employed outside the State of Arkansas; or

An independent contractor;

“Employer” means a person or entity who employs five (5) or more employees in the State of Arkansas in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year before the cause of action arose, or any agent of the person;

“Military service” means current honorable service or honorable discharge from service within six (6) months from the date of the alleged discrimination in any active or reserve component of the United States armed forces; and

“Religious organization” means a church or other place of worship that:

Is located in the state; and

Provides religious services to its congregation.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 920, § 1.